Florida, session 2026, SB1622.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (f) of subsection (8) of section 13 112.3144, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 112.3144âFull and public disclosure of financial 15 interests.â 16 (8)âForms or fields of information for compliance with the 17 full and public disclosure requirements of s. 8, Art. II of the 18 State Constitution must be prescribed by the commission. The 19 commission shall allow a filer to include attachments or other 20 supporting documentation when filing a disclosure. The 21 commission shall give notice of disclosure deadlines and 22 delinquencies and distribute forms in the following manner: 23 (f)âExcept as provided in subparagraph 3., a Any person who 24 is required to file full and public disclosure of financial 25 interests and whose name is on the commissionâs list, and to 26 whom notice has been sent, but who fails to timely file is 27 assessed a fine of $25 per day for each day late up to a maximum 28 of $1,500; however this $1,500 limitation on automatic fines 29 does not limit the civil penalty that may be imposed if the 30 statement is filed more than 60 days after the deadline and a 31 complaint is filed, as provided in s. 112.324. The commission 32 must provide by rule the grounds for waiving the fine and the 33 procedures by which each person whose name is on the list and 34 who is determined to have not filed in a timely manner will be 35 notified of assessed fines and may appeal. The rule must provide 36 for and make specific that the amount of the fine due is based 37 upon when the disclosure is filed on the electronic filing 38 system created and maintained by the commission as provided in 39 s. 112.31446. 40 1.âUpon receipt of the disclosure statement or upon accrual 41 of the maximum penalty, whichever occurs first, the commission 42 shall determine the amount of the fine which is due and shall 43 notify the delinquent person. The notice must include an 44 explanation of the appeal procedure under subparagraph 2. Such 45 fine must be paid within 30 days after the notice of payment due 46 is transmitted, unless appeal is made to the commission pursuant 47 to subparagraph 2. The moneys shall be deposited into the 48 General Revenue Fund. 49 2.âAny reporting person may appeal or dispute a fine, based 50 upon unusual circumstances surrounding the failure to file on 51 the designated due date, and may request and is entitled to a 52 hearing before the commission, which may waive the fine in whole 53 or in part for good cause shown. Any such request must be in 54 writing and received by the commission within 30 days after the 55 notice of payment due is transmitted. In such a case, the 56 reporting person must, within the 30-day period, notify the 57 person designated to review the timeliness of reports in writing 58 of his or her intention to bring the matter before the 59 commission. For purposes of this subparagraph, âunusual 60 circumstancesâ does not include the failure to monitor an e-mail 61 account or failure to receive notice if the person has not 62 notified the commission of a change in his or her e-mail 63 address. 64 3.âA fine may not be assessed against a reporting person 65 the first time a full and public disclosure of financial 66 interests for which he or she is responsible for filing is not 67 timely filed if the full and public disclosure of financial 68 interests was filed before the reporting person accrued the 69 maximum automatic fine for that filing year and the reporting 70 person has not previously received a waiver of an automatic fine 71 pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f)3. The 72 automatic fine shall be assessed, however, if the reporting 73 person has in a previous year accrued the maximum automatic fine 74 pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f), or if he or 75 she has previously received a waiver of an automatic fine 76 pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f)3. This 77 subparagraph applies to fines that began to accrue pursuant to 78 this paragraph after September 1, 2026. 79 Section 2.âParagraph (f) of subsection (8) of section 80 112.3145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 81 112.3145âDisclosure of financial interests and clients 82 represented before agencies.â 83 (8)âBeginning January 1, 2024, forms for compliance with 84 the disclosure requirements of this section and a current list 85 of persons subject to disclosure must be created by the 86 commission. The commission shall allow a filer to include 87 attachments or other supporting documentation when filing a 88 disclosure. Beginning January 1, 2024, the commission shall give 89 notice of disclosure deadlines, delinquencies, and instructions 90 in the following manner: 91 (f)âExcept as provided in subparagraph 3., a Any person 92 required to file a statement of financial interests whose name 93 is on the commissionâs list, and to whom notice has been sent, 94 but who fails to timely file is assessed a fine of $25 per day 95 for each day late up to a maximum of $1,500; however, this 96 $1,500 limitation on automatic fines does not limit the civil 97 penalty that may be imposed if the statement is filed more than 98 60 days after the deadline and a complaint is filed, as provided 99 in s. 112.324. The commission must provide by rule the grounds 100 for waiving the fine and procedures by which each person whose 101 name is on the list and who is determined to have not filed in a 102 timely manner will be notified of assessed fines and may appeal. 103 The rule must provide for and make specific that the amount of 104 the fine is based upon the date and time that the disclosure is 105 filed on the electronic filing system as provided in s. 106 112.31446. 107 1.âBeginning January 1, 2024, for a specified state 108 employee, state officer, or local officer, upon receipt of the 109 disclosure statement by the commission or upon accrual of the 110 maximum penalty, whichever occurs first, the commission shall 111 determine the amount of the fine which is due and shall notify 112 the delinquent person. The notice must include an explanation of 113 the appeal procedure under subparagraph 2. The fine must be paid 114 within 30 days after the notice of payment due is transmitted, 115 unless appeal is made to the commission pursuant to subparagraph 116 2. The moneys are to be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. 117 2.âAny reporting person may appeal or dispute a fine, based 118 upon unusual circumstances surrounding the failure to file on 119 the designated due date, and may request and is entitled to a 120 hearing before the commission, which may waive the fine in whole 121 or in part for good cause shown. Any such request must be in 122 writing and received by the commission within 30 days after the 123 notice of payment due is transmitted. In such a case, the 124 reporting person must, within the 30-day period, notify the 125 person designated to review the timeliness of reports in writing 126 of his or her intention to bring the matter before the 127 commission. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term âunusual 128 circumstancesâ does not include the failure to monitor an e-mail 129 account or failure to receive notice if the person has not 130 notified the commission of a change in his or her e-mail 131 address. 132 3.âA fine may not be assessed against a reporting person 133 the first time a statement of financial interests for which he 134 or she is responsible for filing is not timely filed if the 135 statement of financial interests was filed before the reporting 136 person accrued the maximum automatic fine for that filing year 137 and the reporting person has not previously received a waiver of 138 an automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 139 112.3144(8)(f)3. The automatic fine shall be assessed, however, 140 if the reporting person has in a previous year accrued the 141 maximum automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 142 112.3144(8)(f), or if he or she previously received a waiver of 143 an automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 144 112.3144(8)(f)3. This subparagraph applies to fines that began 145 to accrue pursuant to this paragraph after September 1, 2026. 146 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.